Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 4.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201090-504
Transfer to Ethanol Production Incentive
Cash Fund.

The
State Treasurer shall transfer $2,500,000 from the General Fund to the Ethanol
Production Incentive Cash Fund on or before June 30, 2011, on such date as
directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department
of Administrative Services, pursuant to subdivision (2)(g) of section 66-1345.04.

Laws 2009, LB316, § 4.